Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1246.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 201 and 202 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, are amended by adding subsections to read:Section 201. Definitions.--The following words, terms and phrases when used in this Article II shall have the meaning ascribed to them in this section, except where the context clearly indicates a different meaning:* * *(vvv) "Sexually explicit commercial content." (1) Digital images, video or audiovisual works offered for consideration through an online service that depict sexual acts or nudity and are intended primarily for sexual arousal.(2) The term does not include any of the following:(i) Works with serious literary, artistic, political or scientific value.(ii) Educational or medical materials.(iii) Content determined by a court of competent jurisdiction to be constitutionally protected in a specific instance.(www) "Online adult content subscription." A recurring membership, subscription fee or one-time access fee charged by a vendor for access to sexually explicit commercial content through a website, mobile application or online platform.Section 202. Imposition of Tax.--* * *(i) An additional tax is imposed upon each sale at retail in 20260SB1246PN1550 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 this Commonwealth and the use within this Commonwealth of online adult content subscriptions, subject to the following:(1) The additional tax shall be at the rate of ten per cent.(2) The additional tax shall be collected by the vendor at the time of the transaction and shall be stated separately from the charge for the online adult content subscription.(3) The place of taxation shall be determined in accordance with factors under this act and regulations promulgated thereunder, including billing address, payment address and other indicia adopted by the department.(4) Each vendor making taxable sales of online adult content subscriptions to residents of this Commonwealth shall be deemed a vendor maintaining a place of business in this Commonwealth, regardless of physical presence, and shall be required to register, collect and remit the tax in accordance with this act.(5) The department shall adopt rules and regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of this subsection, including methods to determine the location of the subscriber of the online adult content subscription.(6) All taxes, interest and penalties collected in accordance with this subsection shall be deposited into the General Fund and credited as nonmotor tax revenues.(7) A vendor claiming an exemption from registering, collecting and remitting the tax shall maintain records as the department requires.(8) The additional tax does not apply to:(i) Sales of educational, artistic, scientific or medical digital content.(ii) Sales to or use by the United States Government or the Commonwealth and its political subdivisions.20260SB1246PN1550 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iii) Advertising services provided on online platforms unrelated to online adult content subscription access.Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2027.20260SB1246PN1550 - 4 - 123